Illinois, session 104th, HB5241.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-1195 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1195 new)7    Sec. 5-1195. Late property tax distribution in Cook 8County.9    (a) If Cook County is delinquent in distributing property 10tax proceeds to taxing districts, as defined in Section 1-150 11of the Property Tax Code, the proceeds of property taxes 12imposed by the taxing districts that Cook County is required 13to collect from taxpayers and distribute to the taxing 14districts, then Cook County shall reimburse the taxing 15districts for (i) the interest that the taxing districts would 16have earned from keeping the proceeds of property taxes in 17reserves and (ii) the interest that taxing districts paid on 18debts incurred because Cook County is delinquent in 19distributing property tax proceeds to taxing districts.20    (b) A home rule unit may not regulate the distribution of 21moneys in a manner inconsistent with this Section. This 22Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 23Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent   HB5241- 2 -LRB104 18096 RTM 31535 b1exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 2by the State.